Montana, session 2025, SB145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Education membership organizations and associations -- open
meetings and records. All meetings and records of an education membership organization or association
composed of public or government entities supported in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by public funds
must be open to the public to the same extent as the meetings and records of the member public or
government entities.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 1, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 145